cs: Typ montáže tyče: Strop; Dveře; Nosník; Stěna; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem em barra: Teto; Porta; Trave; Parede; Outro
es: Tipo de montaje de barra: Techo; Puerta; Viga; Pared; Otros
zh-CN: 杆安装类型: 天花板; 门; 托梁; 墙; 其他
nb: Barmonteringstype: Tak; Dør; Bjelke; Vegg; Annen
lt-LT: Skersinio tvirtinimo tipas: Ant lubų; Ant durų; Ant sijos; Ant sienos; Kita
hr-HR: Način postavljanja šipke: Strop; Vrata; Greda; Zid; Ostalo
fr: Type de fixation de la barre: Plafond; Porte; Solive; Mur; Autre
pl: Rodzaj mocowania baru: Sufit; Brama; Legar; Ściana; Pozostałe
da: Monteringstype for bar: Loft; Dør; Bjælke; Væg; Andet
sv: Typ av stångmontering: Tak; Dörr; Bjälklag; Vägg; Annat
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve vadbene palice: Na strop; Na vrata; Na tram; Na steno; Drugo
zh-TW: 長桿安裝類型: 天花板; 門; 托樑; 牆; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem em barra: Teto; Porta; Viga; Parede; Outro
en: Bar mounting type: Ceiling; Door; Joist; Wall; Other
fi: Tangon asennustyyppi: Katto; Ovi; Palkki; Seinä; Muu
tr: Bar montaj tipi: Tavan; Kapı; Kiriş; Duvar; Diğer
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης μπάρας: Οροφή; Πόρτα; Δοκός; Τοίχος; Άλλο
ko: 바 장착 타입: 천장; 문; 들보; 벽; 기타
vi: Loại lắp thanh: Trần nhà; Cửa; Dầm; Tường; Khác
hu: Rúd rögzítési típusa: Mennyezet; Ajtó; Födémgerenda; Fal; Egyéb
ja: バー取付タイプ: 天井; ドア; ジョイスト; 壁; その他
nl: Type montagestang: Plafond; Deur; Draagbalk; Muur; Andere
ru: Способ установки турника: На потолке; На двери; На балке; На стене; Другое
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งบาร์: เพดาน; ประตู; ตง; ผนัง; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di montaggio su barra: Soffitto; Porta; Travetto; Parete; Altro
sk-SK: Typ montáže na lištu: Strop; Dvere; Trám; Stena; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de montare bară: Plafon; Ușă; Traversă; Perete; Altele
de: Stangenmontagetyp: Decke; Tür; Träger; Wand; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на лостове: Таван; Врата; Гредоред; Стена; Други